Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.230

Office of health consumer assistance created—Duties.

There is created in the department an office of health consumer assistance. The office shall establish a statewide hotline and shall assist and serve as an advocate for consumers who are complainants or witnesses in a licensing or disciplinary proceeding.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 303.]